Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 8. General Provisions.

Sec. 43.82.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“affected municipality” means an economically affected municipality or a revenue-affected municipality;

“commencement of commercial operations” means the start of regular deliveries of marketable products from an approved qualified project;

“cubic foot of gas” means the quantity of gas contained in a volume of one cubic foot at a standard temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit and a standard absolute pressure of 14.65 pounds per square inch;

“economic proximity” means the distance within which a person may be willing to design, construct, and operate a gas line to provide service to a local consumer;

“economic rent” means the estimated total gross revenue less estimated total costs for a qualified project over the term of a contract under AS

43.82.020

, measured in undiscounted nominal dollars; for purposes of this paragraph, total costs do not include a rate of return on capital, financing costs, or any payments to governments;

“economically affected municipality” means a municipality the commissioner of revenue determines will be reasonably required to provide additional public services under the terms proposed in an application approved under AS

43.82.140(a)

; the commissioner may consider historical data from construction of the Trans Alaska Pipeline System, and information submitted by a municipality in making the determination;

“full project funding” means full approval by a party to a contract under AS

43.82.020

for the expenditure of the capital necessary for construction and operation of the approved qualified project that is subject to the contract;

“gas” has the meaning given in AS

43.55.900

;

“group” means two or more persons;

“lease or property” has the meaning given in AS

43.55.900

;

“periodic payment” means payment made in lieu of one or more other taxes under a contract under AS

43.82.020

;

“revenue-affected municipality” means a municipality that the commissioner of revenue reliably expects will be restricted from imposing a tax, or a portion of a tax, as a result of implementation of a contract developed under this chapter;

“stranded gas” means gas that is not being marketed due to prevailing costs or price conditions as determined by an economic analysis by the commissioner for a particular project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Sec. 43.82.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Stranded Gas Development Act.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)